fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON manâ-
manâ-/:manâ/ iT- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/15 [0/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ koskw- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/15 [2/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ nakaT- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/15 [0/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ nîpâ- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/15 [1/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ pat- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/15 [1/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ pîkw- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/15 [0/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ sisikot- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/15 [1/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ sîht- "weight: 27.775481" ; ! n=2/15 [0/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ tôt- "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/15 [1/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ tôtaw- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/15 [1/145429]
manâ-/:manâ/ wîht- "weight: 28.468628" ; ! n=1/15 [0/145429]

LEXICON manâ2-
manâ2-/:manâ/ -h "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/2 [2/145429]

LEXICON manât-
manât-/:manât/ -h "weight: 16.023326" ; ! n=7/25 [59/145429]
manât-/:manât/ -ht2 "weight: 16.467044" ; ! n=5/25 [53/145429]
manât-/:manât/ -isi "weight: 18.645576" ; ! n=6/25 [5/145429]
manât-/:manât/ -m1 "weight: 16.940828" ; ! n=5/25 [33/145429]
manât-/:manât/ -âst- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/25 [1/145429]
manât-/:manât/ -âstim "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/25 [1/145429]

LEXICON manê-
manê-/:manê/ -hpw- "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
manê-/:manê/ -isi "weight: 18.955731" ; ! n=2/5 [11/145429]
manê-/:manê/ -paýi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/5 [1/145429]
manê-/:manê/ w "weight: 27.929632" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]

LEXICON masaskw-
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -cihc- "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -hkaS "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -hkahtê "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -hkas "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -hkaso "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -hkasw "weight: 27.706488" ; ! n=3/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -htin1 "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -iýaw1 "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -iýât "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -n1 "weight: 19.002251" ; ! n=7/29 [3/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -oht1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/29 [1/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -ohtah "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/29 [1/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -paýi "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -piT "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -pit "weight: 28.111953" ; ! n=2/29 [0/145429]
masaskw-/:masaskw/ -sin1 "weight: 28.805101" ; ! n=1/29 [0/145429]

LEXICON masin-
masin-/:masin/ -ah1 "weight: 10.699454" ; ! n=58/149 [1461/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -ahw1 "weight: 18.645576" ; ! n=2/149 [15/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -atah "weight: 19.002251" ; ! n=3/149 [7/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -hkoT "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/149 [1/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -hkot "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/149 [3/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -hkw- "weight: 21.423599" ; ! n=5/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -ht- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/149 [1/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -ht2 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/149 [1/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -htatâ "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/149 [1/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -paýi "weight: 17.218460" ; ! n=5/149 [25/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -paýih "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=2/149 [3/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -paýihtâ "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/149 [1/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -pê "weight: 17.210492" ; ! n=9/149 [14/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -pêh "weight: 17.461806" ; ! n=7/149 [14/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -pêhw "weight: 22.339889" ; ! n=2/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -sin1 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/149 [2/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -stah "weight: 18.309104" ; ! n=7/149 [6/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -stahw "weight: 22.339889" ; ! n=2/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -sâw- "weight: 20.660480" ; ! n=2/149 [2/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -sâwâT "weight: 23.033037" ; ! n=1/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -sâwân "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/149 [2/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -sâwât "weight: 22.339889" ; ! n=2/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -âT "weight: 17.210492" ; ! n=6/149 [21/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -âpisk- "weight: 21.934424" ; ! n=3/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -âsk2- "weight: 21.241277" ; ! n=6/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -âskis "weight: 21.934424" ; ! n=3/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -âskiso "weight: 23.033037" ; ! n=1/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -âskisw "weight: 22.339889" ; ! n=2/149 [0/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -âso2 "weight: 17.210492" ; ! n=6/149 [21/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -âstê2 "weight: 19.561867" ; ! n=4/149 [3/145429]
masin-/:masin/ -î1 "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/149 [2/145429]

LEXICON maskaht-
maskaht-/:maskaht/ -h "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=3/3 [1/145429]

LEXICON maskahtwê-
maskahtwê-/:maskahtwê/ -n3 "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
maskahtwê-/:maskahtwê/ -sk3 "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
maskahtwê-/:maskahtwê/ -w2 "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
maskahtwê-/:maskahtwê/ -win "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/5 [1/145429]
@R.class.AI@maskahtwê-+Der/V:@R.class.AI@maskahtwê VAI-ae "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/5 (VAI-1) [3/145429]

LEXICON maskam-
maskam-/:maskam/ -iwê "weight: 26.522718" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
maskam-/:maskam/ -to "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=1/3 [2/145429]
@R.class.TA@maskam-+Der/V:@R.class.TA@maskam VTA "weight: 18.196626" ; ! n=1/3 (VTA-1) [47/145429]

LEXICON maskatê-
maskatê-/:maskatê/ apw- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
maskatê-/:maskatê/ apwê- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 manâ- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=12/27654 [6/145429]
0 manâ2- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [2/145429]
0 manât- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=22/27654 [151/145429]
0 manê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=5/27654 [12/145429]
0 masaskw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=26/27654 [4/145429]
0 masin- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=105/27654 [1415/145429]
0 maskaht- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [1/145429]
0 maskahtwê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [4/145429]
0 maskam- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [49/145429]
0 maskatê- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
LEXICON o1-
o1-/:o/ manât- "weight: 23.736196" ; ! n=1/251 [0/145429]
o1-/:o/ masin- "weight: 23.736196" ; ! n=1/251 [0/145429]
LEXICON o2-
o2-/:o/ manât- "weight: 23.368762" ; ! n=1/392 [0/145429]
o2-/:o/ masin- "weight: 17.364643" ; ! n=3/392 [36/145429]
o2-/:o/ maskahtwê- "weight: 22.675615" ; ! n=2/392 [0/145429]
